Missouri, session 2026, HB3472.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 328.020 and 328.080, RSMo, are repealed and three new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 328.020, 328.077, and 328.080, to read as
follows:
328.020. Except as provided in section 328.077, it shall be unlawful for any person
to practice the occupation of a barber in this state, unless he or she shall have first obtained a
license, as provided in this chapter.
328.077. 1. The board shall create an establishment training program to allow
unlicensed persons to provide barbering services under the supervision of a licensee at a
licensed barber establishment. The board shall allow any licensed barber establishment
to register to participate in the establishment training program.
2. A licensed barber establishment registered under this section may employ a
person, without regard to the person's licensure status under this chapter, to provide
barbering services that would otherwise require licensure under this chapter. Any
person providing such barbering services shall provide the services only under the
supervision of a licensee who holds an active license to practice barbering under this
chapter and who regularly provides such services in the registered establishment. For
purposes of this section, "supervision" means the supervising licensee is physically
present with the person providing barbering services and available to assist in providing
the services.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3472 2
3. Before a person provides barbering services without a license under this
section, the person shall complete a one-time course of not more than four hours of
education regarding sanitation and the laws of this state that is approved or created by
the board. Completion of the course may be self-certified by the establishment.
4. The board shall not require a person participating in the program to take an
examination or the barber establishment to obtain approval of the curriculum for
continuing education. The owner of the registered barber establishment shall be
responsible for ensuring the education, training, skills, and competence of any person
providing services under this section.
5. A licensed barber establishment participating in the establishment training
program shall comply with all requirements of this chapter and any rules applicable to
barber establishments relating to facility standards, sanitation, infection control,
inspections, and establishment licensure and renewal.
6. Before a consumer receives barbering services from a person providing
services without a license under this section, the barber establishment shall provide a
written disclosure that is clearly legible and states substantially the following: "This
establishment is a licensed barber establishment registered to participate in an
establishment training program. This establishment employs unlicensed individuals
who provide services under the supervision of licensed barbers. The services you are
receiving are from an unlicensed individual participating in this program.".
7. A supervising licensee under this section shall not be required to hold a barber
instructor license under section 328.090 or a barber apprentice supervisor license under
section 328.075 solely in order to supervise a person providing services under this
section, and participation in the establishment training program shall not create any
new instructor license category.
8. The board may suspend or revoke an establishment's registration to
participate in the establishment training program for violations of this chapter or
corresponding rules, including under circumstances in which the board has probable
cause to believe that a person's health or safety has been harmed by an unlicensed
person training under this section, and may order the establishment to immediately
cease participation pending further proceedings. Any establishment subject to
suspension or revocation of registration under this section shall have the right to file
a complaint with the administrative hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
9. Participation in the establishment training program under this section shall
not subject the participants to the penalties in section 328.160 related to unlicensed
practice.

HB 3472 3
10. Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with barbering
apprenticeships.
328.080. 1. Any person desiring to practice barbering in this state shall make
application for a license to the board and shall pay the required barber examination fee.
2. The board shall examine each qualified applicant and, upon successful completion
of the examination and payment of the required license fee, shall issue the applicant a license
authorizing him or her to practice the occupation of barber in this state. The board shall admit
an applicant to the examination, if it finds that he or she:
(1) Is seventeen years of age or older;
(2) Is free of contagious or infectious diseases that are capable of being transmitted
during the ordinary course of business for a person licensed under this chapter;
(3) Either:
(a) Has studied for at least one thousand hours in a period of not less than six months
in a properly appointed and conducted barber school under the direct supervision of a licensed
instructor; or, if the applicant is an apprentice, the applicant shall have served and completed
no less than two thousand hours under the direct supervision of a licensed barber apprentice
supervisor; or
(b) Submits satisfactory proof, signed by the supervising licensee or licensees, of
having completed no less than two thousand hours of supervised practice in a registered
barber establishment under the establishment training program created in section
328.077;
(4) Is possessed of requisite skill in the trade of barbering to properly perform the
duties thereof, including the preparation of tools, shaving, haircutting and all the duties and
services incident thereto; and
(5) Has sufficient knowledge of the common diseases of the face and skin to avoid the
aggravation and spread thereof in the practice of barbering.
3. The board shall be the judge of whether the barber school, the barber
apprenticeship, or college is properly appointed and conducted under proper instruction to
give sufficient training in the trade.
4. The sufficiency of the qualifications of applicants shall be determined by the board.
✔